Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 3 Salary Deductions

45-7-50.
Deductions for United States savings bonds.

The disbursing or fiscal officer of any state department, board, bureau, commission, agency, municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof may deduct from the salary of any employee of this state, county, municipality, or political subdivision thereof such amount as the employee shall authorize in writing for the purchase of United States savings bonds for the employee. The written authorization shall be filed with the disbursing or fiscal officer of such state department, board, bureau, commission, agency, municipality, or county, and he shall make such rules and regulations governing the purchase of the bonds as he may deem necessary, which rules and regulations shall be incorporated in the employee’s written authorization. The authorization of the employee may be withdrawn by the employee at any time upon filing written notice of withdrawal with said disbursing or fiscal officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 323, § 1.

45-7-51.
Deductions for payment of insurance premiums.

Any department or agency of the state is authorized to deduct voluntarily designated amounts from the salaries or wages of its full-time employees for the purpose of payment of insurance premiums to a designated insurance company or designated insurance companies which are licensed to do business in Georgia by the Commissioner of Insurance. No such deduction shall be made without the approval of the head of the department or agency employing the designating employee. No such deductions shall be made unless at least 15 percent of the full-time employees of a department or agency request such deductions which are to be paid to a particular insurance company. No such deductions shall be made without individual written requests of the employees, which requests shall designate the exact amount which is to be deducted. Any employee who consents to such a deduction is authorized to terminate the deduction upon two weeks’ written notice. Each department head may discontinue allowing such deductions upon reasonable notice to the company and his employees.

The fiscal authorities or other employees of the various departments or agencies of the state will not incur any liability for errors or omissions made in the performance of the payroll deduction agreement between the department or agency and the employees, provided that no fiscal authority or employee of this state is protected from criminal or civil liability for conversion, theft by conversion, theft by taking, theft by extortion, theft by deception, or any other intentional misappropriation of the moneys or property of another for his own use.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1603, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-7-52.
Deductions for payments to credit unions.

Any department or agency of the state is authorized to deduct designated amounts from the salaries or wages of its employees for the purpose of payment of deposits or indebtedness to a department or agency credit union if such department or agency credit union is a corporation and existing under the laws of this state. No such deduction shall be made without the approval of the head of the department or agency. No such deductions shall be made without the written request of the employee, which request shall designate the exact amount which is to be deducted. Any employee who has consented to a deduction is authorized to withdraw from such plan upon two weeks’ written notice.

The fiscal authorities or other employees of the various departments or agencies will not incur any liability for errors or omissions made in the performance of the agreement between the department or agency and the employee.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 255, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references.

Credit unions generally, §

7-1-630

et seq.

45-7-53.
Deductions for payment of parking and van pool fees.

Any department, agency, authority, or commission of the state is authorized to deduct designated amounts from the salaries or wages of its employees for the purpose of payment of capitol hill parking and van pool fees. No such deduction shall be made without the approval of the head of the department, agency, authority, or commission and the Georgia Building Authority. No such deduction shall be made without the written request of the employee, which request shall designate the exact amount which is to be deducted. Any employee who has consented to a deduction is authorized to withdraw from such plan upon one month’s written notice.

The fiscal authorities or other employees of the various departments, agencies, authorities, or commissions will not incur any liability for errors or omissions made in the performance of the agreement between the department, agency, authority, or commission and the employee.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1049, §§ 1, 2.

45-7-54.
Voluntary contributions by state government employees through payroll deductions to certain not for profit organizations.

Any department, agency, authority, or commission of the state is authorized to deduct designated amounts from the salaries or wages of its employees and remit such moneys to not for profit organizations, associations, or corporations providing tangible services and benefits to state government or its employees. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, no such deduction shall be made unless at least 2,500 of the full-time employees of the state request such deduction. Where 2,500 or more full-time employees of the state request payroll deduction services to any not for profit organization, association, or corporation having among its objectives educational, legislative, or professional development activities related to promoting and enhancing the efficiency, productivity, and welfare of state government services or of state government employees, then the state shall provide such deductions as an additional employment benefit to its employees.

Where 500 or more full-time state employees who are employed in the Division of Family and Children Services or in the law enforcement, corrections officer, or registered nursing disciplines request payroll deduction services to any not for profit association having among its specific objectives (1) professional development activities related to such employment, (2) the provision of assistance to or on behalf of persons who are killed, injured, in need of medical attention, or otherwise in need of assistance while engaged in such employment or as a result of such employment, or (3) promoting or enhancing law enforcement, corrections, or registered professional nursing in the State of Georgia, then the state shall provide such deductions as an additional employment benefit to its employees. This provision shall not be interpreted to require the agency or state to provide the funds for any employee’s dues or contributions.

The commissioner of administrative services shall have the authority to administer this Code section and to determine and compel compliance with its provisions.

No deduction shall be made under this Code section without the express written and voluntary consent of the employee. Each such request shall designate the exact amount to be deducted. Any employee who consents to such deduction is authorized to terminate the deduction with two weeks’ written notice to the department, agency, authority, or commission.

No deduction shall be made under this Code section to any organization, association, or corporation which engages in collective bargaining with the state or encourages its members to strike or stop work.

Each department, agency, authority, or commission of the state shall collect from the deductions withheld a cost of administration fee not to exceed 1 percent of the total deduction collected.

No person shall disclose to any other person the name of any employee deducting amounts, or the organizations, associations, or corporations designated, except as is necessary to accomplish the purpose of this article or as otherwise authorized in writing by the individual employee.

Departments, agencies, authorities, and commissions and their employees shall not incur any liability for errors or omissions made in performance of the payroll deduction agreement between the state and the employee, provided that this Code section does not confer immunity from criminal or civil liability for conversion, theft by conversion, theft by taking, theft by extortion, theft by deception, or any other intentional misappropriation of the money or property of another.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-7-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 699, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 831, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2005, p. 466, § 1/HB 183; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-70/HB 642.

Cross references.

Deductions for contributions or dues to interdisciplinary charitable associations, §

20-3-83

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-7-55.
Deductions for transit passes and other fare media.

It is the purpose of this Code section to permit voluntary deductions from wages or salaries of employees of the State of Georgia for the purchase of transit passes and other fare media for the benefit of these employees and the State of Georgia through a process which involves minimal disruption of work time and provides reasonable assurance to the employees of reliable transportation to and from work.

Any department, agency, authority, or commission of the state is authorized to participate in any program to provide a mass transit employee benefit to its employees and may, but need not, bear all or a portion of the cost of such fare media from funds specifically appropriated for this purpose.

Any such participating state entity is authorized to deduct designated amounts from the wages or salaries of its employees for the purpose of facilitating employee purchase of transit passes and other fare media. No such deduction shall be made without the approval of the head of the participating state entity. No such deduction shall be made without the written request of the employee, who may withdraw that person’s request upon one month’s written notice.

The fiscal authorities or other employees of any participating state entity will not incur any liability for errors or omissions made in the performance of the mass transit employee benefit program.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-7-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 831, § 1.1.

45-7-56.
Deductions for purchase of personal computing and computer related equipment.

As used in this Code section, the term “local unit of administration” means any county or independent board of education.

It is the purpose of this Code section to permit voluntary deductions from wages or salaries of employees of the State of Georgia and local units of administration for the purchase of personal computing and computer related equipment through an employee purchase program facilitated by and through the Georgia Technology Authority and for the purchase of consumer offerings through an employee purchase program facilitated by and through the Department of Administrative Services.

Any department, agency, authority, or commission of the state or any local unit of administration is authorized to deduct designated amounts from the wages or salaries from its employees for the purpose of facilitating employee purchases of personal computing and computer related equipment through an employee purchase program facilitated by and through the Georgia Technology Authority and for the purpose of facilitating employee purchases of consumer offerings through an employee purchase program facilitated by and through the Department of Administrative Services. No such deduction shall be made under this Code section without the express written and voluntary consent of the employee. Each such request shall designate the exact amount to be deducted. Any employee who has consented to a deduction is authorized to withdraw from such salary reduction with two weeks’ written notice; provided, however, that such withdrawal shall not relieve any employee of any outstanding indebtedness incurred under such purchase program.

The fiscal authorities or other employees of the various departments or agencies of this state will not incur any liability for errors or omissions made in the performance of the agreement between the state and the employee.

The fiscal authorities or other employees of local units of administration will not incur any liability for errors or omissions made in the performance of the agreement between the local unit of administration and the employee.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, this Code section does not confer immunity from criminal or civil liability for conversion, theft by conversion, theft by taking, theft by extortion, theft by deception, or any other intentional misappropriation of the money or property of another.

If a state employee or public school employee leaves employment for any reason and a balance is owing for the computer, equipment, or consumer offering, then, in that event, the state or board of education or the state retirement system shall have the right to deduct the balance owing from any funds under the control of the state or board of education or state retirement system to which said employee would otherwise be entitled.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-7-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 867, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1411, § 1/HB 551.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added “and for the purchase of consumer offerings through an employee purchase program facilitated by and through the Department of Administrative Services” at the end of subsection (b); added “and for the purpose of facilitating employee purchases of consumer offerings through an employee purchase program facilitated by and through the Department of Administrative Services” at the end of the first sentence in subsection (c); and substituted “computer, equipment, or consumer offering,” for “computer or equipment,” in subsection (e).

45-7-57.
Deduction from wages for contributions into savings trust accounts.

Any department, agency, authority, commission, or other instrumentality of the state is authorized to deduct designated amounts from the wages or salaries of its employees and remit such moneys to one or more savings trust accounts established under Article 11 of Chapter 3 of Title 20.

No payroll deduction shall be made under this Code section without the employee’s written and voluntary consent designating the exact amount to be deducted.

Any employee who has authorized a deduction under this Code section is authorized to end such salary deduction upon written notice to the employer.

The fiscal authorities or other employees of the various departments, agencies, authorities, commissions, or other instrumentalities of this state shall incur no liability for errors or omissions made in the administration of payroll deductions authorized under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-7-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 594, § 1.